Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.060

Impaneling of jury.

The jury impaneled to hear the evidence and determine the compensation to be paid to the owner or owners of such real estate desired for such schoolhouse site purpose shall consist of twelve persons unless a less number be agreed upon, and shall be selected, impaneled, and sworn in the same manner that juries in other civil actions are selected, impaneled, and sworn, provided a juror may be challenged for cause on the ground that he or she is a taxpayer of the district seeking the condemnation of any real estate.

[ 2011 c 336 s 273; 1909 p 373 s 6; 1903 c 111 s 6; RRS s 911.]

NOTES:

Juries, civil actions, selection, impaneling and swearing of: Chapters 2.36, 4.44 RCW.

Juries in courts of limited jurisdiction: RCW 2.36.050.